West Virginia, session 2026, HB4662.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 8. Crimes by and Proceedings Against Inmates. §62-8-1a. Inmates in possession of illegal drugs or testing positive for illegal drugs while incarcerated; penalties; when testing begins. (a) While incarcerated, inmates should not be in possession of illegal drugs nor test positive for the use of illegal drugs. If any inmate is found to be in possession of illegal drugs or tests positive for illegal drugs while incarcerated, the following penalties shall apply:(1) For a first offense, the incarcerated individual shall have six months added to the sentence they are currently serving, with any term of confinement pursuant to this subdivision is to be consecutive to any term of confinement already imposed; and(2) For a second or subsequent offense, the incarcerated individual shall have one year added to the sentence they are currently serving, which shall be served consecutively in addition to the current sentence, for each instance of possession or a positive drug test; and(3) If there are multiple instances of possession or positive drug tests, the sentences shall run consecutive following the completion of the sentence the incarcerated individual is currently serving.(b) Testing for the use of illegal drugs shall begin after three months of incarceration for every incarcerated individual and shall be conducted thereafter in accordance with the availability of testing equipment and staff to conduct said tests or upon suspicion that the incarcerated individual may be in possession of illegal drugs or fail a drug test for illegal drugs.